trunk/apertium-es-ca/apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
<pardef n="/saber__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>sabríem</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabria</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabríeu</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabries</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabrien</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabria</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabrem</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabré</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabreu</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabràs</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabran</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabrà</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>sabéssim</l>  <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>sabés</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>sabéssiu</l>  <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>sabessis</l>  <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>sabessin</l>  <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>sabés</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabent</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabent</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>sabérem</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>sabí</l>      <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>sabéreu</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>saberes</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>saberen</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>sabé</l>      <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sapiguem</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sapiem</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sapiguem</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sapiem</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sapigueu</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sapieu</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sapigueu</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sapieu</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sàpigues</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sàpies</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sàpigues</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sàpies</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sàpiguen</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sàpien</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sàpiguen</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sàpien</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sàpiga</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sàpia</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sàpiga</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sàpia</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>saber</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>saber</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabíem</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabia</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabíeu</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabies</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabien</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabia</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sabéssim</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sabérem</l>  <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sabés</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sabera</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sabéssiu</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sabéreu</l>  <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sabessis</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>saberes</l>  <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sabessin</l> <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>saberen</l>  <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sabés</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sabera</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabudes</l>   <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabuda</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabuts</l>    <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabut</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabem</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sé</l>        <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sabeu</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>saps</l>      <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>saben</l>     <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sap</l>       <r>saber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="saber">           <par n="/saber__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="saber greu">      <i></i><par n="/saber__vblex"/><p><l><b/>greu</l><r><g><b/>greu</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="saber on té la mà dreta"><i></i><par n="/saber__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on<b/>té<b/>la<b/>mà<b/>dreta</l><r><g><b/>on<b/>té<b/>la<b/>mà<b/>dreta</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="saber res de res"><i></i><par n="/saber__vblex"/><p><l><b/>res<b/>de<b/>res</l><r><g><b/>res<b/>de<b/>res</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="saber un borrall"><i></i><par n="/saber__vblex"/><p><l><b/>un<b/>borrall</l><r><g><b/>un<b/>borrall</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="saber un fum">    <i></i><par n="/saber__vblex"/><p><l><b/>un<b/>fum</l><r><g><b/>un<b/>fum</g></r></p></e>
